District of Columbia statutes.
22-1310

Urging dogs to fight or create disorder.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons to entice, induce, urge, or cause any dogs to engage in a fight in any street, alley, road, or highway, open space, or public square in the District of Columbia, or to urge, entice, or cause such dogs to continue or prolong such fight, under a penalty of not more than $1,000 for each and every offense; and any person or persons who shall induce or cause any animal of the dog kind to run after, bark at, frighten, or bite any person, horse, or horses, cows, cattle of any kind, or other animals lawfully passing along or standing in or on any street, avenue, road, or highway, or alley in the District of Columbia, shall forfeit and pay for such offense a sum not exceeding $1,000.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 324, ch. 320, § 10
Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176,§ 7, 35 DCR 4787
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 104, 41 DCR 2608

Cross References

Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1110.
1973 Ed., § 22-1110.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 104 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).